Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 660.353 is amended to read:
660.353. [ (1)] (1)(a) There is  created in the Higher Education Coordinating Commission the
Oregon Youth Employment Program[ . Subject to the availability of funding, the commission shall
create and operate, and local workforce development boards shall manage, the program to provide ],
which shall operate subject to  the availability of funds, including eligible federal funds, for
the purpose of providing meaningful work experience and workforce training for persons  between
the ages of 14 and 24.
(b) The commission shall, pursuant to criteria established by the commission, and after
allocating a portion of program funds to the Oregon Youth Corps described  in ORS 418.653,
provide grants to local workforce development boards. The  commission shall award grants
in a manner that ensures no less than 20 percent of  program funds are available to organ-
izations with direct experience serving communities of color.
(2) The program shall [ provide to participants in the program case management and support ser-
vices that include, but are not limited to ]:
(a) [ Developing ] Ensure that at least 75 percent of program participants  are from com-
munities of color, rural communities, communities  that have faced generational poverty or
other communities that have been historically underrepresented in youth employment  as
identified by the commission by rule;
(b) Create  an individual development  plan for [ the] each program  participant that outlines
work readiness, career and educational goals;
[(b)] (c) Provide  work readiness instruction;
[(c)] (d) Provide at least [ 12] five weeks  of paid internships , pre-apprenticeships or other work
experience; [and]
[(d)] (e) Pay at least minimum wage for work performed  by program participants while
in the program, or, if a program participant is prohibited  by other state or federal law or
agreement from receiving wages from  the program provider, provide an award valued at an
amount equal to at least the payment of minimum wage;
(f) Provide academic support for  earning high school graduation credit, completion of approved
high school equivalency programs such  as the General Educational Development (GED) certificate
program or earning college credit for work experience or internships provided through the
program[.];
Enrolled House Bill 2092 (HB 2092-B) Page 1
(g) Expose program participants to in-demand occupations and targeted sectors;
(h) Require program providers to submit a  community engagement plan that details how
the program providers will partner  with and serve communities identified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection; and
(i) Require program providers to offer English language learner and  accessibility services
that are compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990  (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.).
(3) The program[ :]
[(a) Plan, implementation procedures and evaluation criteria shall be described in the local  plan
developed by a local workforce development board under ORS 660.327. ]
[(b)] may provide for public and private sector employment opportunities.
[(4) Local workforce development boards responsible for managing  the program shall ensure ap-
propriate training and positive work experiences for participants. ]
[(5)] (4)(a)  The commission shall  [ collaborate with the local workforce development boards to ]
collect data on the program,  [ youth work experience programs that ] identify successful work expe-
riences and allow for the identification and dissemination of the most promising practices.
(b) The data collected shall [ also] be disaggregated by:
(A) The race and ethnicity of program participants;
(B) Whether program participants come from urban or rural areas;
(C) The family income of program participants; and
(D) Any other characteristic of program participants that the  commission determines
by rule would be useful in evaluating the success of the program.
(c) The data collected shall include :
(A) The number of participants in the program[ ,];
(B) The number of participants that complete the program[ ,];
(C) The cost of internships and other work experiences provided[ ,];
(D) The academic credit earned by participants ; and
(E) The number of certificates  for passing approved high school equivalency tests such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test earned by participants.
(5) The commission shall  conduct culturally responsive outreach and engagement and
offer technical assistance to prospective program providers.
(6) In  a manner determined by the commission by rule, the commission shall assist
identified program providers in recruiting program participants across diverse communities
by providing:
(a) Translation and accessibility services for marketing materials; and
(b) Training to program providers in culturally responsive,  social emotional health and
mental health practices.
[(6)] (7) The commission shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and operation  of the
program created under subsection (1) of this section. The  rules shall include, but are not limited to,
establishing eligibility criteria for persons participating in the program.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.653 is amended to read:
418.653. (1) Subject to the availability of funds,  there is created within the Oregon Youth
Employment Program established under ORS 660.353  an Oregon Youth  Corps that shall provide
emergency services, public conservation, rehabilitation and  improvement programs. The corps shall
be headed by a program director, and shall be administered through the Higher Education  Coordi-
nating Commission.
(2) Upon implementation of subsection (1) of this section, there shall be  created an Oregon
Youth Corps Advisory Board to consist of nine members, three to be appointed  by the President of
the Senate, three to be appointed by the Speaker  of the House of Representatives and three public
members to be appointed by the Governor. No more than one Senator and one  Representative shall
be appointed.
Enrolled House Bill 2092 (HB 2092-B) Page 2
(3) Board members may receive reimbursement of necessary and actual expenses under ORS
292.495 (2), but may not receive compensation under  ORS 292.495 (1) or otherwise for participation
as a board member.
(4) Board members may be removed by the appointing authority. Vacancies shall  be filled by
the appointing  authority. Board members shall serve for a term of three years and may be reap-
pointed for an additional consecutive term.
(5) The advisory board established under subsection (2) of this section shall advise  the program
director on the implementation of ORS 418.650 to 418.663.
SECTION 3.  ORS 418.658 is amended to read:
418.658. (1) The program director of the Oregon Youth Corps shall establish within the Oregon
Youth Employment Program established under ORS  660.353 a separate program known as the
Oregon Community Stewardship Corps. In addition  to the established purposes of the Oregon Youth
Corps, the purpose of  the Oregon Community Stewardship Corps is to promote community service
activities  throughout  the state for a broad cross section of Oregon disadvantaged and at-risk youth
through programs that also include appropriate educational and job training  opportunities for par-
ticipants.
(2) In addition to projects submitted under ORS 418.660 (1), projects of the Oregon  Community
Stewardship Corps may include, but shall not be limited to:
(a) Child care services.
(b) Elderly and disabled care services.
(c) Literacy education programs.
(d) Recycling and other waste reduction services.
(3) The Oregon Community Stewardship Corps shall  offer employment and educational opportu-
nities of at least three but not more than 12 months’ duration for selected participants.
(4) Under rules adopted  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, participants who
successfully complete any program under this section shall be eligible for up to $1,500 in  support
vouchers that can be used to pay for tuition, books or other items or services  that enhance and
support education or employment.
(5) All Oregonians who are at least  13 years of age and under 25 years of age are eligible to
participate in the program. To ensure that Oregon Community Stewardship  Corps participants rep-
resent a broad cross  section of Oregonians, special emphasis shall be given to recruiting school
dropouts and other disadvantaged and at-risk youth, according to criteria established by the Oregon
Youth Corps Advisory Board.
(6) To the extent practicable, the program director shall enlist state and federal agencies,  local
government, nonprofit organizations and private  businesses, and any combination of such entities,
to act as sponsors for programs administered  under this section. Selection of sponsors shall be based
on criteria that include the following:
(a) The availability of  other resources on a matching basis, including contributions from private
sources, other federal, state and local agencies, and  moneys available through the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act;
(b) The  provision of related educational and job training programs to participants, including but
not limited to school and college coursework, training for approved high school  equivalency tests
such as the  General Educational Development (GED), project-related education and professional
training;
(c) Assurances that proposed projects will not displace existing employees or duplicate existing
private or government programs; and
(d) Assurances that  proposed projects are devoted to the enhancement of the community and
are not based in maintenance activities and that these projects meet an identified need.
(7) In consultation with the advisory board, the program director shall make grants for programs
administered under this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2092 (HB 2092-B) Page 3
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2092 (HB 2092-B) Page 4